Maryland, session 2025, SB0877.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
1–501.
The circuit courts are the highest common–law and equity courts of record exercising
original jurisdiction within the State. Each has full common–law and equity powers and
jurisdiction in all civil and criminal cases within its county, and all the additional powers
and jurisdiction conferred by the Constitution and by law, except where by law jurisdiction
has been limited or conferred exclusively upon another tribunal.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0877*

SENATE BILL 877
1–503.
(a) In each county in the first seven judicial circuits there shall be the number of
resident judges of the circuit court set forth below, including the judge or judges provided
for by the Constitution:
(1) Allegany ................................................................................................... 2
(2) Anne Arundel ........................................................................................ 13
(3) Baltimore County .................................................................................. 21
(4) Calvert ..................................................................................................... 3
(5) Caroline ................................................................................................... 1
(6) Carroll...................................................................................................... 4
(7) Cecil ......................................................................................................... 4
(8) Charles .................................................................................................... 5
(9) Dorchester ............................................................................................... 1
(10) Frederick ................................................................................................. 6
(11) Garrett ..................................................................................................... 1
(12) Harford .................................................................................................... 6
(13) Howard .................................................................................................... 5
(14) Kent ......................................................................................................... 1
(15) Montgomery .......................................................................................... 24
(16) Prince George’s ..................................................................................... 25
(17) Queen Anne’s .................................................................................... [1] 2
(18) St. Mary’s ................................................................................................ 3
(19) Somerset .................................................................................................. 1
(20) Talbot ....................................................................................................... 1
(21) Washington ............................................................................................ 6

SENATE BILL 877 3
(22) Wicomico .................................................................................................. 4
(23) Worcester ................................................................................................. 3
(b) In Baltimore City there shall be 35 resident judges of the Circuit Court for
Baltimore City.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.